Ayeri_Lexc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Sg +Pl @P.Animacy.animate@ @P.Animacy.inanimate@ +A +P +Dat +Gen+ +Loc 
+Caus +Ins NPref+ +Q +Top @P.Topic.ON@ @D.Topic.ON@ @R.Topic.ON@ @P.Number.Pl@ @D.Number.Pl@
+Adj +Noun +Nom +Comp +Supl +Neg APref+ ^[ ^] +Dim 


LEXICON Root
 Nouns ;
 Adjectives ;
 NounPrefixes ; 
 AdjectivePrefixes ; 
 0:^[{ DimWithPref ;

 
 
LEXICON Nouns
mavi SetAnimate ;
tipuy SetAnimate ;
lā SetAnimate ;
pruy SetInanimate ; 
huākaya SetAnimate ;
nekuyi SetAnimate ; 
kina SetAnimate ;
sobaya SetAnimate ;
melung SetInanimate ;
tinkay SetInanimate ;
ibang SetAnimate ;
tenyan SetAnimate ;
veney SetAnimate ;
sirutay SetInanimate ;


LEXICON Adjectives
cāmpuluy IsAdjective ; 
tahi IsAdjective ;
baho IsAdjective ;
pakur IsAdjective ;
agon IsAdjective ;
ming IsAdjective ;


LEXICON DimWithPref
NPref+:-ku- Nouns ;
NPref+:-da- Nouns ; ! "such" 
NPref+:-eda- Nouns ; ! "this"
NPref+:-ada- Nouns ; ! "that"

LEXICON SetAnimate
+Dim:}^2^] IsAnimate ;
@P.Animacy.animate@ IsNoun ;


LEXICON SetInanimate
+Dim:}^2^] IsInanimate ;
@P.Animacy.inanimate@ IsNoun ;



LEXICON IsInanimate
@P.Animacy.inanimate@ IsNoun ;


LEXICON IsAnimate
@P.Animacy.animate@ IsNoun ;


LEXICON IsAdjective
+Adj:0 # ; 
+Adj:0 AdjectiveComparison ; 
+Adj:0 AdjectiveNegation ; 
+Adj:0 AdjectiveNominalization ;


LEXICON IsNoun
+Noun:0 IsTopic ;
+Noun:0 Number ;
 IsAdjective ;


LEXICON IsTopic
< "+Top":[0] "@P.Topic.ON@" > Number ; 


LEXICON Number
< "+Pl":[[y] [e] ] "@D.Topic.ON@" "@P.Number.Pl@" > Case ;
< "+Sg":[0] "@D.Topic.ON@"  > Case ;
< "+Pl":[[y] [e] ] "@R.Topic.ON@"  > # ;
< "+Sg":[0] "@R.Topic.ON@"  > # ;


LEXICON Case
< "+A":[[a] [n] [g] ] "@R.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@" > # ; 	
< "+A":[[r] [e] [n] [g] ] "@R.Animacy.inanimate@" "@D.Animacy.animate@" >  # ; 	
< "+P":[[a] [s] ] "@R.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@" > # ; 	
< "+P":[[l] [e] [y] ] "@R.Animacy.inanimate@" "@D.Animacy.animate@" > # ; 	
< "+Dat":[[y] [a] [m] ] > # ; 	
< "+Gen":[[E] [n] [a] ] > # ; ! If a noun stem ends in a consonant, the marker become  -ena, sonst na
< "+Loc":[[y] [a] ] > # ; 
< "+Caus":[[i] [s] [a] ] > # ;
< "+Ins":[[E] [r] [i] ] > # ; ! ri ending in a vowel, eri  when ending in a cons
< "+A":[[a] [n] [g] ] "@R.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@" > Quantifier ; 	
< "+A":[[r] [e] [n] [g] ] "@R.Animacy.inanimate@" "@D.Animacy.animate@" >  Quantifier ; 	
< "+P":[[a] [s] ] "@R.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@" > Quantifier ; 	
< "+P":[[l] [e] [y] ] "@R.Animacy.inanimate@" "@D.Animacy.animate@" > Quantifier ; 	
< "+Dat":[[y] [a] [m] ] > Quantifier ; 	
< "+Gen":[[E] [n] [a] ] > Quantifier ; 
< "+Loc":[[y] [a] ] > Quantifier ; 
< "+Caus":[[i] [s] [a] ] > Quantifier ;
< "+Ins":[[E] [r] [i] ] > Quantifier ;


LEXICON NounPrefixes 
< "NPref+":[[k] [u] [%-] ] > Nouns ; ! außer ku ubo, nicht kuubo p. 89 "like"P.xy.xy
< "NPref+":[[d] [a] [%-] ] > Nouns ; ! "such" 
< "NPref+":[[e] [d] [a] [%-] ] > Nouns ; ! "this"
< "NPref+":[[a] [d] [a] [%-] ] > Nouns ; ! "that"


LEXICON AdjectivePrefixes
< "APref+":[[k] [u] [%-] ] > Adjectives ; !like
< "APref+":[[d] [a] [%-] ] > Adjectives ; !"such" 
< "APref+":[[e] [d] [a] [%-] ] > Adjectives ; ! "this"
< "APref+":[[a] [d] [a] [%-] ]> Adjectives ; ! "that"


LEXICON AdjectiveNominalization
<"+Nom":[[a] [n] ] "@D.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@"> AdjectiveComparison ; 
<"+Nom":[[a] [n] ] "@D.Animacy.animate@" "@D.Animacy.inanimate@"> # ; 


LEXICON AdjectiveComparison
< "+Comp":[[%-] [e] [n] [g] ] > AdjectiveNegation ;
< "+Comp":[[%-] [e] [n] [g] ] > # ;
< "+Supl":[[%-] [v] [ā]]  > AdjectiveNegation ;
< "+Supl":[[%-] [v] [ā]] > # ;


LEXICON AdjectiveNegation
< "+Neg":[[a] [r] [y] [a]] > # ;
< "+Neg":[[o] [y]] > # ;


LEXICON Quantifier 
< "+Q":[[%-] [i] [k] [a] [n]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "many / much" very
< "+Q":[[%-] [i] [k] [o] [y]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "not many / much" not very
< "+Q":[[%-] [a] [r] [i] [l]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "some"
< "+Q":[[%-] [e] [n] [g]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "more" rather
< "+Q":[[%-] [h] [e] [n]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "all, every, each " 
< "+Q":[[%-] [k] [a] [y]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "few" a bit
< "+Q":[[%-] [v] [ā]] "@D.Number.Pl@" > # ; 	! "most"
